src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/V-unimorphstuff_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
    almõldõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: aʼlmõldõkstõ
    almõldõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: aʼlmõldõkstõ
    almõldõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: aʼlmõldõks
    almõldõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: aʼlmõldõksmõ
    almõldõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: aʼlmõldõkstõ
    almõldõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: aʼlmõldõkstõ
    almõldõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: aʼlmõld
    almõldõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: aʼlmõld
    almõldõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: aʼlmõldõgid
    almõldõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: aʼlmõldõgid
    almõldõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: aʼlmõldõg
    almõldõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: aʼlmõldõg
    almõldõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: aʼlmõldõgõd
    almõldõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: aʼlmõldõgõd
    almõldõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: aʼlmõldiji
    almõldõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: aʼlmõldijid
    almõldõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: aʼlmõldijid
    almõldõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: aʼlmõldõn
    almõldõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: aʼlmõldõnd
    almõldõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aʼlmõldtõd
    almõldõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aʼlmõldtõb
    almõltõ+V+Inf: aʼlmõltõ
    almõltõ+V+Ger: aʼlmõltõs
    almõltõ+V+Sup: aʼlmõltõm
    almõltõ+V+Sup+Ela: aʼlmõltõmõst
    almõltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aʼlmõltõb
    almõltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: aʼlmõltõd
    almõltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aʼlmõltõb
    almõltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: aʼlmõltõm
    almõltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: aʼlmõltõt
    almõltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: aʼlmõltõbõd
    almõltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: aʼlmõltiz
    almõltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: aʼlmõltizt
    almõltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: aʼlmõltiz
    almõltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: aʼlmõltizmõ
    almõltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [aʼlmõltizt, aʼlmõltiztõ]
    almõltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [aʼlmõltizt, aʼlmõltiztõ]
    almõltõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: aʼlmõlt
    almõltõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: aʼlmõltõm
    almõltõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: aʼlmõltõt
    almõltõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: aʼlmõltõt
    almõltõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: aʼlmõltõks
    almõltõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: aʼlmõltõkst
    almõltõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: aʼlmõltõks
    almõltõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: aʼlmõltõksmõ
    almõltõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: aʼlmõltõkstõ
    almõltõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: aʼlmõltõkstõ
    almõltõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: aʼlmõltõks
    almõltõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: aʼlmõltõksmõ
    almõltõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: aʼlmõltõkstõ
    almõltõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: aʼlmõltõkstõ
    almõltõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: aʼlmõlt
    almõltõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: aʼlmõlt
    almõltõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: aʼlmõltõgid
    almõltõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: aʼlmõltõgid
    almõltõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: aʼlmõltõg
    almõltõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: aʼlmõltõg
    almõltõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: aʼlmõltõgõd
    almõltõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: aʼlmõltõgõd
    almõltõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: aʼlmõltiji
    almõltõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: aʼlmõltijid
    almõltõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: aʼlmõltijid
    almõltõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: aʼlmõltõn
    almõltõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: aʼlmõltõnd
    almõltõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aʼlmõltõd
    almõltõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aʼlmõltõb
    altõ+V+Inf: aʼltõ
    altõ+V+Ger: aʼltõs
    altõ+V+Sup: aʼltõm
    altõ+V+Sup+Ela: aʼltõmõst
    altõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aʼltõb
    altõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: aʼltõd
    altõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aʼltõb
    altõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: aʼltõm
    altõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: aʼltõt
    altõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: aʼltõbõd
    altõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: aʼltiz
    altõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: aʼltizt
    altõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: aʼltiz
    altõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: aʼltizmõ
    altõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [aʼltizt, aʼltiztõ]
    altõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [aʼltizt, aʼltiztõ]
    altõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: aʼlt
    altõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: aʼltõm
    altõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: aʼltõt
    altõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: aʼltõt
    altõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: aʼltõks
    altõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: aʼltõkst
    altõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: aʼltõks
    altõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: aʼltõksmõ
    altõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: aʼltõkstõ
    altõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: aʼltõkstõ
    altõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: aʼltõks
    altõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: aʼltõksmõ
    altõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: aʼltõkstõ
    altõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: aʼltõkstõ
    altõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: aʼlt
    altõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: aʼlt
    altõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: aʼltõgid
    altõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: aʼltõgid
    altõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: aʼltõg
    altõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: aʼltõg
    altõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: aʼltõgõd
    altõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: aʼltõgõd
    altõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: aʼltiji
    altõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: aʼltijid
    altõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: aʼltijid
    altõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: aʼltõn
    altõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: aʼltõnd
    altõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aʼltõd
    altõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aʼltõb
    aļtõ+V+Inf: aļtõ
    aļtõ+V+Ger: aļtõs
    aļtõ+V+Sup: aļtõm
    aļtõ+V+Sup+Ela: aļtõmõst
    aļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aļtõb
    aļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: aļtõd
    aļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aļtõb
    aļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: aļtõm
    aļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: aļtõt
    aļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: aļtõbõd
    aļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: aļtiz
    aļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: aļtizt
    aļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: aļtiz
    aļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: aļtizmõ
    aļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [aļtizt, aļtiztõ]
    aļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [aļtizt, aļtiztõ]
    aļtõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: aļt
    aļtõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: aļtõm
    aļtõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: aļtõt
    aļtõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: aļtõt
    aļtõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: aļtõks
    aļtõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: aļtõkst
    aļtõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: aļtõks
    aļtõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: aļtõksmõ
    aļtõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: aļtõkstõ
    aļtõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: aļtõkstõ
    aļtõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: aļtõks
    aļtõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: aļtõksmõ
    aļtõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: aļtõkstõ
    aļtõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: aļtõkstõ
    aļtõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: aļt
    aļtõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: aļt
    aļtõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: aļtõgid
    aļtõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: aļtõgid
    aļtõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: aļtõg
    aļtõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: aļtõg
    aļtõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: aļtõgõd
    aļtõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: aļtõgõd
    aļtõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: aļtiji
    aļtõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: aļtijid
    aļtõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: aļtijid
    aļtõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: aļtõn
    aļtõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: aļtõnd
    aļtõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aļtõd
    aļtõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aļtõb
    āmbaztõ+V+Inf: āmbaztõ
    āmbaztõ+V+Ger: āmbaztõs
    āmbaztõ+V+Sup: āmbaztõm
    āmbaztõ+V+Sup+Ela: āmbaztõmõst
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: āmbaztõb
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: āmbaztõd
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: āmbaztõb
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: āmbaztõm
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: āmbaztõt
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: āmbaztõbõd
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: āmbaztiz
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: āmbaztizt
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: āmbaztiz
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: āmbaztizmõ
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [āmbaztizt, āmbaztiztõ]
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [āmbaztizt, āmbaztiztõ]
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: āmbazt
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: āmbaztõm
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: āmbaztõt
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: āmbaztõt
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: āmbaztõks
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: āmbaztõkst
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: āmbaztõks
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: āmbaztõksmõ
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: āmbaztõkstõ
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: āmbaztõkstõ
    āmbaztõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: āmbaztõks
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: āmbaztõksmõ
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: āmbaztõkstõ
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: āmbaztõkstõ
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: āmbazt
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: āmbazt
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: āmbaztõgid
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: āmbaztõgid
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: āmbaztõg
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: āmbaztõg
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: āmbaztõgõd
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: āmbaztõgõd
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: āmbaztiji
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: āmbaztijid
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: āmbaztijid
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: āmbaztõn
    āmbaztõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: āmbaztõnd
    āmbaztõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: āmbaztõd
    āmbaztõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: āmbaztõb
    amtlõ+V+Inf: amtlõ
    amtlõ+V+Ger: amtlõs
    amtlõ+V+Sup: amtlõm
    amtlõ+V+Sup+Ela: amtlõmõst
    amtlõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: amtlõb
    amtlõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: amtlõd
    amtlõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: amtlõb
    amtlõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: amtlõm
    amtlõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: amtlõt
    amtlõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: amtlõbõd
    amtlõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: amtliz
    amtlõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: amtlizt
    amtlõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: amtliz
    amtlõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: amtlizmõ
    amtlõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [amtlizt, amtliztõ]
    amtlõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [amtlizt, amtliztõ]
    amtlõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: amtlõ
    amtlõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: amtlõm
    amtlõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: amtlõt
    amtlõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: amtlõt
    amtlõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: amtlõks
    amtlõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: amtlõkst
    amtlõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: amtlõks
    amtlõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: amtlõksmõ
    amtlõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: amtlõkstõ
    amtlõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: amtlõkstõ
    amtlõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: amtlõks
    amtlõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: amtlõksmõ
    amtlõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: amtlõkstõ
    amtlõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: amtlõkstõ
    amtlõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: amtõl
    amtlõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: amtõl
    amtlõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: amtlõgid
    amtlõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: amtlõgid
    amtlõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: amtlõg
    amtlõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: amtlõg
    amtlõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: amtlõgõd
    amtlõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: amtlõgõd
    amtlõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: amtliji
    amtlõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: amtlijid
    amtlõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: amtlijid
    amtlõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: amtlõn
    amtlõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: amtlõnd
    amtlõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: amtõltõd
    amtlõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: amtõltõb
    āndatõ+V+Inf: āndatõ
    āndatõ+V+Ger: āndatõs
    āndatõ+V+Sup: āndatõm
    āndatõ+V+Sup+Ela: āndatõmõst
    āndatõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: āndatõb
    āndatõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: āndatõd
    āndatõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: āndatõb
    āndatõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: āndatõm
    āndatõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: āndatõt
    āndatõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: āndatõbõd
    āndatõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: āndatiz
    āndatõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: āndatizt
    āndatõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: āndatiz
    āndatõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: āndatizmõ
    āndatõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [āndatizt, āndatiztõ]
    āndatõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [āndatizt, āndatiztõ]
    āndatõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: āndat
    āndatõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: āndatõm
    āndatõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: āndatõt
    āndatõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: āndatõt
    āndatõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: āndatõks
    āndatõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: āndatõkst
    āndatõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: āndatõks
    āndatõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: āndatõksmõ
    āndatõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: āndatõkstõ
    āndatõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: āndatõkstõ
    āndatõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: āndatõks
    āndatõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: āndatõksmõ
    āndatõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: āndatõkstõ
    āndatõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: āndatõkstõ
    āndatõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: āndat
    āndatõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: āndat
    āndatõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: āndatõgid
    āndatõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: āndatõgid
    āndatõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: āndatõg
    āndatõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: āndatõg
    āndatõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: āndatõgõd
    āndatõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: āndatõgõd
    āndatõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: āndatiji
    āndatõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: āndatijid
    āndatõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: āndatijid
    āndatõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: āndatõn
    āndatõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: āndatõnd
    āndatõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: āndatõd
    āndatõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: āndatõb
    andõ+V+Inf: andõ
    andõ+V+Ger: andõs
    andõ+V+Sup: āndam
    andõ+V+Sup+Ela: āndamõst
    andõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: āndab
    andõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: āndad
    andõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: āndab
    andõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: āndam
    andõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: āndat
    andõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: āndabõd
    andõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: āndiz
    andõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: āndizt
    andõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: āndiz
    andõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: āndizmõ
    andõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [āndizt, āndiztõ]
    andõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [āndizt, āndiztõ]
    andõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ānda
    andõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: āndam
    andõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: āndat
    andõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: āndat
    andõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: āndaks
    andõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: āndakst
    andõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: āndaks
    andõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: āndaksmõ
    andõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: āndakstõ
    andõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: āndakstõ
    andõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: āndaks
